Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-106
Certificate of nomination, defined.

Certificate of nomination shall mean a document issued to a candidate who receives the requisite number of votes and qualifies to be placed on a general election ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 6.